Arkansas, session 2025, HB1929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 13 — Recognizing Judea and Samaria Act

25-1-1301. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Refer to the land controlled by Israel from Jordan during
the 1967 Six-Day War by its historical name of "Judea and Samaria", with the
land south of Jerusalem being considered "Judea" and the land north of
Jerusalem being considered "Samaria"; and
(2) No longer use the term "West Bank" in official government
materials.

25-1-1302. Prohibition on use of materials that use the term "West
*LGL080*
04-03-2025 11:56:12 LGL080

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1929
Bank" — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Official government material" means a guidance, rule,
material, briefing, press release,or communication prepared by a state
agency; and
(2) "State agency" means every department, division, office,
board, commission, and institution of this state.
(b)(1) Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, a
state agency shall not use the term "West Bank" to refer to Judea and Samaria
in an official government material.
(2) A state agency shall not use state moneys to create an
official government material that refers to Judea and Samaria as "West Bank".
(c) The executive head of a state agency may waive the prohibition
under subsection (b) of this section if the executive head:
(1) Determines that it is in the interests of the state to do
so; and
(2) Submits a written explanation of the waiver no later than
thirty (30) days after the date on which the executive head of the state
agency makes a determination under subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the:
(A) General Assembly if the General Assembly is in
session; or
(B) Legislative Council if the General Assembly is not in
session.

/s/McAlindon











04-03-2025 11:56:12 LGL080